fi: Mailanpään liitoskohdan tyyppi: Pikalukitus/valmistajakohtainen; Vakio; Kavennettu; Muu
ru: Тип шейки лезвия: Быстросъемный / фирменный; Стандартный; Конический; Другое
pt-PT: Tipo de encaixe da lâmina: Libertação rápida/proprietário; Padrão; Cónico; Outros
cs: Typ krčku / patky čepele: Rychloupínací / proprietární; Standardní; Zúžené; Jiné
fr: Type de hosel de lame: À libération rapide/propriétaire; Standard; Conique; Autre
vi: Loại khớp nối lưỡi: Tháo lắp nhanh/độc quyền; Tiêu chuẩn; Thuôn dần; Khác
it: Tipo di tubo della lama: A sgancio rapido/proprietario; Standard; Affusolato; Altro
th: ประเภทคอใบมีดไม้ฮอกกี้: ปลดเร็ว/เฉพาะแบรนด์; มาตรฐาน; เรียวปลาย; อื่นๆ
da: Klingens halsform: Quick-release/beskyttet; Standard; Konisk; Andet
nb: Blad slangetype: Hurtigkobling / proprietær; Standard; Avsmalnende; Annet
ro-RO: Tip furtun lamă: Eliberare rapidă/proprietar; Standard; Conic; Altele
nl: Bladschacht type: Quick-release/merkspecifiek; Standaard; Tapered; Anders
hr-HR: Tip spoja hosela oštrice: S brzim otpuštanjem / vlasnički standard; Standardni; Suženi; Ostalo
hu: Penge nyaktípusa: Gyorskioldós / egyedi; Szabványos; Kúpos; Egyéb
sk-SK: Typ krčka golfovej hlavy typu blade: Rýchloupínací/proprietárny; Štandardný; Zúžený; Iné
ko: 블레이드 호젤 유형: 퀵릴리스/독점형; 표준형; 테이퍼드; 기타
zh-CN: 剑条插口类型: 快拆/专有; 标准; 锥形; 其他
tr: Bıçak hosel tipi: Hızlı çıkarılabilir/tescilli; Standart; Konik; Diğer
lt-LT: Ašmenų kaklelio tipas: Greito atleidimo / specifinis; Standartinis; Siaurėjantis; Kita
sv: Skenans fästtyp: Snabbkoppling/varumärkesspecifik; Standard; Avsmalnande; Övrigt
de: Typ des Klingenhosels: Schnellverschluss/Proprietär; Standard; Konisch; Sonstige
pt-BR: Tipo de encaixe da lâmina: Engate rápido/proprietário; Padrão; Cônico; Outro
ja: ブレードホースタイプ: クイックリリース / 独自規格; スタンダード; テーパード; その他
en: Blade hosel type: Quick-release/proprietary; Standard; Tapered; Other
pl: Typ hosela łopatki: Szybkozłącze / własny system; Standardowy; Zwężany; Inny
es: Tipo de unión entre la hoja y el hosel: Cierre rápido/patentado; Estándar; Cónico; Otro
zh-TW: 刀片插鞘類型: 快拆/專利; 標準; 漸細; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta nosila rezila: Za hitro sprostitev/lastniški; Standardni; Stožčasti; Drugo
el: Τύπος λαιμού λεπίδας: Γρήγορης απελευθέρωσης / Ιδιόκτητο (Proprietary); Τυπικό; Tapered; Άλλο
bg-BG: Тип на шийката (свързващата част) на острието: За бързо освобождаване/специфично; Стандартно; Заострено (Tapered); Други